District of Columbia statutes.
5-1333

Expenses.

The District of Columbia shall not pay any expenses of the establishment or maintenance of the memorial.

History

May 23, 1989, D.C. Law 8-2, § 4, 36 DCR 2371

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 4-1123.